Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.080

Who may bring action on bond.

Every official bond executed by any officer pursuant to law, shall be in force and obligatory upon the principal and sureties therein, to and for the state of Washington, and to and for the use and benefit of all persons who may be injured or aggrieved by the wrongful act or default of such officer, in his official capacity, and any person so injured or aggrieved may bring suit on such bond in his or her own name without an assignment thereof.

[ 1890 p 34 s 3; RRS s 9932.]

NOTES:

Action on official bond: RCW 42.08.020.